Nebraska, session 109, LB267.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB267 LB267
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 76-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
76-1401 Sections 76-1401 to 76-1449 and sections 2 and 3 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Residential Landlord and
Tenant Act.
Sec. 2. (1) Where an act of domestic violence is perpetrated
against a tenant or household member by another cotenant or occupant of
the same dwelling unit, the tenant may have the perpetrator removed from
the rental agreement and, if needed, excluded from the premises if the
tenant or household member has:
(a) Obtained a protective order, restraining order, or other similar
relief which applies to the perpetrator of the act of domestic violence;
or
(b) Obtained certification confirming domestic violence as set forth
in subdivision (5)(a)(iii) of section 76-1431.
(2) To have the perpetrator removed from a rental agreement under
this section, the tenant shall:
(a) Provide the landlord a copy of the documentation described in
subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Provide the landlord a written notice containing:
(i) The full legal name of the cotenant or occupant who is the
perpetrator of the act of domestic violence;
(ii) The date on which the tenant wishes the notice of termination
to be served upon the perpetrator. Such date shall be at least five days
after the date the tenant provides the documentation and written notice
to the landlord and no more than thirty days after such date; and
(iii) The tenant's preferred method by which to receive future
communications from the landlord.
(3) When a tenant has provided the landlord with documentation and
written notice, as described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section,
the landlord shall proceed under subsection (4) of section 76-1431
-2-

LB267 LB267
2025 2025
against only the cotenant or occupant who is the perpetrator of the act
of domestic violence. The landlord shall serve the five-day notice
provided for in subsection (4) of section 76-1431 on such perpetrator on
the date provided by the requesting tenant under subdivision (2)(b)(ii)
of this section.
(4)(a) If the perpetrator vacates the premises within the five-day
notice period described in subsection (4) of section 76-1431, the
landlord shall:
(i) Install a new lock to the dwelling unit, pursuant to section 3
of this act; and
(ii) Timely notify the requesting tenant by the method provided
under subdivision (2)(b)(iii) of this section to inform the requesting
tenant how the tenant can obtain access to the re-keyed unit.
(b) If the perpetrator fails to vacate the premises within the five-
day notice period described in subsection (4) of section 76-1431, the
landlord shall:
(i) File suit for recovery of possession of the premises against the
perpetrator only;
(ii) Timely notify the requesting tenant by the method provided
under subsection (2)(b)(iii) of this section to inform them of the
hearing date set in the suit.
(c) If judgment is entered in favor of the landlord in a suit
brought pursuant to subsection (4) of section 76-1431, the landlord
shall:
(i) Be entitled to recover court costs and reasonable attorney's
fees from the perpetrator;
(ii) Install a new lock to the dwelling unit, pursuant to section 3
of this act;
(iii) Timely notify the requesting tenant by the method provided
under subdivision (2)(b)(iii) of this section to inform the requesting
tenant of the reasonable method by which the tenant can obtain access to
-3-

LB267 LB267
2025 2025
the re-keyed unit; and
(iv) Refuse to provide the perpetrator with access to the dwelling
unit to reclaim property unless a law enforcement officer escorts the
perpetrator into and out of the dwelling.
(5) A landlord is not liable for any actions taken in good faith
pursuant to this section.
Sec. 3. (1) When an act of domestic violence is perpetrated against
a tenant or household member by someone who is not a cotenant or occupant
of the same dwelling unit, the tenant may require the landlord to change
the lock to the tenant's dwelling unit if the tenant or household member
has:
(a) Obtained a protective order, restraining order, or other similar
relief which applies to the perpetrator of the act of domestic violence;
or
(b) Obtained certification confirming domestic violence as set forth
in subdivision (5)(a)(iii) of section 76-1431.
(2) To have a lock changed under this section, the tenant shall:
(a) Provide the landlord a copy of the documentation described in
subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) Provide the landlord a written notice containing the request
that the locks be changed immediately.
(3) The landlord shall change the locks to the tenant's dwelling
unit within twenty-four hours after receiving the tenant's written
request by either:
(a) Replacing the entire locking mechanism with a locking mechanism
of equal or better quality than the lock being replaced; or
(b) If the lock is in good working condition:
(i) Rekeying the lock; or
(ii) In the case of a keyless electronic lock, resetting the entry
code.
(4)(a) If a landlord fails to change the locks as required by
-4-

LB267 LB267
2025 2025
subsection (3) of this section, the tenant:
(i) May change the locks in a workmanlike manner with locks of
similar or better quality than the original lock;
(ii) Shall timely notify the landlord that the locks have been
changed; and
(iii) Shall, by a reasonable method agreed upon by the landlord and
tenant, provide the landlord with a new key or the entry code by which to
access the dwelling unit.
(b) This subsection applies notwithstanding any provision in the
rental agreement to the contrary.
(5) A landlord who installs a new lock pursuant to this section may
retain a copy of the key or entry code that opens the new lock.
(6) The landlord may require the tenant to pay for the actual and
reasonable cost incurred by the landlord in changing the locks under this
section.
Sec. 4. Original section 76-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-5-